Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. JUDGES

CHAPTER 31. ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION OF JUSTICES OF COURTS OF APPEAL

Sec. 31.001. AUTHORITY FOR COUNTY PAYMENT OF COMPENSATION. The commissioners courts in the counties of each of the 15 courts of appeals districts may pay additional compensation in an amount that does not exceed the limitations of Section 659.012 to each of the justices of the courts of appeals, other than a justice of the Court of Appeals of the Fifteenth Court of Appeals District, residing within the court of appeals district that includes those counties. The compensation is for all extrajudicial services performed by the justices.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.44, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 11), Sec. 3, eff. December 1, 2005.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 459 (S.B. 1045), Sec. 2.04, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 31.002. COMPENSATION ADDITIONAL. The compensation authorized by Section 31.001 is in addition to the compensation provided by law and paid by the state to the justices of the courts of appeals.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 31.003. LIMITATIONS. (a) The total of additional compensation authorized by this chapter to be paid to the individual justices of a court of appeals district may not exceed the total additional compensation authorized to be paid to any district judge residing within the same court of appeals district.

(b) The combined salary of each associate justice and chief justice of the courts of appeals is subject to the salary differentials provided by Subchapter B, Chapter 659.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 1.45, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 5.95(104), eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 31.004. EQUAL INSTALLMENTS. The compensation authorized by this chapter shall be paid in:

(1) equal monthly installments; or

(2) equal biweekly installments if authorized by the commissioners courts in the counties of the court of appeals district.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 560), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.